Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 30. Bail.

Revisor’s notes. —

Chapter 20, SLA 1966, which repealed and reenacted this chapter, was based largely on SB 1357, 89th Congress, First Session.

Cross references. —

For court rules on bail, see Rule 41, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure; for constitutional provisions, see
art. I, § 11, Alaska Constitution.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 19, SLA 2010 (House Bill 324), relating to the 2010 additions, amendments, reenactments, and repeals of provisions of this chapter, see 2010 House Journal 1401 — 1404.

Collateral references. —

8A Am. Jur. 2d, Bail and Recognizance, § 1 et seq.

8 C.J.S., Bail, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 12.30.006.
Release procedures.

At the first appearance before a judicial officer, a person charged with an offense shall be released or detained under the provisions of this chapter.

At the first appearance before a judicial officer, a person may be detained up to 48 hours for the prosecuting authority to demonstrate that release of the person under AS

12.30.011

would not reasonably ensure the appearance of the person or will pose a danger to the victim, other persons, or the community, if the person has

been charged with an unclassified, class A, class B, or class C felony; or

a criminal conviction or charge outside the state.

A person who remains in custody 48 hours after appearing before a judicial officer because of inability to meet the conditions of release shall, upon application, be entitled to have the conditions reviewed by the judicial officer who imposed them. If the judicial officer who imposed the conditions of release is not available, any judicial officer in the judicial district may review the conditions.

If a person remains in custody after review of conditions by a judicial officer under (c) of this section, the person may request a subsequent review of conditions. Unless the prosecuting authority stipulates otherwise or the person has been incarcerated for a period equal to the maximum sentence for the most serious charge for which the person is being held, a judicial officer may not schedule a bail review hearing under this subsection unless

the person provides to the court and the prosecuting authority a written statement that new information not considered at the previous review will be presented at the hearing; the statement must include a description of the information and the reason the information was not presented at a previous hearing; in this paragraph, “new information” includes the person’s inability to post the required bail if the person can show that the person made a good faith effort to post the required bail;

the prosecuting authority and any surety, if applicable, have at least 48 hours’ written notice before the time set for the review requested under this subsection; the defendant shall notify the surety; and

at least seven days have elapsed between the previous review and the time set for the requested review; however, a person may receive only one bail review hearing solely for inability to pay.

A judicial officer may solicit comments by the victim or a parent or guardian of a minor victim who is present at the bail review hearing and wishes to comment. The judicial officer shall consider those comments and any response by the person before making a decision concerning the release of the person.

The judicial officer shall issue written or oral findings that explain the reasons the officer imposed the particular conditions of release or modifications or additions to conditions previously imposed. The judicial officer shall inform the person that a law enforcement officer or a pretrial services officer under AS 33.07 may arrest the person without a warrant for violation of the court’s order establishing conditions of release.

Information offered or introduced at a bail hearing to determine conditions of release need not conform to the rules governing the admissibility of evidence.

History.

(§ 4 ch 19 SLA 2010; am §§
55 — 58 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 26 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 10 ch 22 SLA 2018; am §§ 56 — 58 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(o)(1) — (4), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (b), see sec. 75(a)(21), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (b), inserted “, other than a class C felony and the person has been assessed as low risk under AS

12.30.011

(c)(1),” following “with a felony”; substituted “AS

12.30.011

” for “AS

12.30.011(a)

”; substituted “ensure” for “assure”; added the last sentence in (c) and added (c)(1) and (c)(2); in (d)(1), substituted “includes the person's inability” for “does not include the inability”; at the end of (d)(3), inserted “; however, a person may receive only one bail review hearing solely for inability to pay”; in (f), inserted “or a pretrial services officer under AS 33.07” preceding “may arrest”.

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in the introductory language in (b), deleted “who is charged with a felony, other than a class C felony and the person has been assessed as low risk under AS

12.30.011(c)(1)

,” preceding “may be detained”, inserted “, if the person has been charged with the following crimes:” at the end, added (b)(1) — (3).

The 2018 amendment, effective June 15, 2018, rewrote (b).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “that has not been used in determining the person’s risk level in the pretrial risk assessment under AS 33.07” at the end of (b)(2); rewrote (c), which read, “A person who remains in custody 48 hours after appearing before a judicial officer because of inability to meet the conditions of release shall, upon application, be entitled to have the conditions reviewed by the judicial officer who imposed them. If the judicial officer who imposed the conditions of release is not available, any judicial officer in the judicial district may review the conditions. Upon review of the conditions, the judicial officer shall revise any conditions of release that have prevented the defendant from being released unless the judicial officer finds on the record that there is clear and convincing evidence that less restrictive release conditions cannot reasonably ensure the

“(1) appearance of the person in court; and

“(2) safety of the victim, other persons, and the community.”; and in (d), added “if the person can show that the person made a good faith effort to post the required bail” at the end of (d)(1), and substituted “48 hours’” for “48 hours”” in (d)(2).

Effective dates. —

Section 32, ch. 19, SLA 2010 makes this section effective July 1, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

Under § 31(c), ch. 19, SLA 2010, this section applies “to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Section 142(a), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of (b) – (d) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 12.30.010.
Bail before or after conviction; restrictions on release without bail. [Repealed, § 30 ch 19 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 12.30.011.
Release before trial.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a judicial officer shall order a person charged with an offense to be released on the person’s personal recognizance or upon execution of an unsecured appearance bond, on the condition that the person

obey all court orders and all federal, state, and local laws;

appear in court when ordered;

if represented, maintain contact with the person’s lawyer; and

notify the person’s lawyer, who shall notify the prosecuting authority and the court, not more than 24 hours after the person changes residence.

If a judicial officer determines that the release under (a) of this section will not reasonably ensure the appearance of the person or will pose a danger to the victim, other persons, or the community, the officer shall impose the least restrictive condition or conditions that will reasonably ensure the person’s appearance and protect the victim, other persons, and the community. In addition to conditions under (a) of this section, the judicial officer may, singly or in combination,

require the execution of an appearance bond in a specified amount of cash to be deposited into the registry of the court, in a sum not to exceed 10 percent of the amount of the bond;

require the execution of a bail bond with sufficient solvent sureties or the deposit of cash;

require the execution of a performance bond in a specified amount of cash to be deposited in the registry of the court;

place restrictions on the person’s travel, association, or residence;

order the person to refrain from possessing a deadly weapon on the person or in the person’s vehicle or residence;

require the person to maintain employment or, if unemployed, actively seek employment;

require the person to notify the person’s lawyer and the prosecuting authority within two business days after any change in employment;

require the person to avoid all contact with a victim, a potential witness, or a codefendant;

require the person to refrain from the consumption and possession of alcoholic beverages;

require the person to refrain from the use of a controlled substance as defined by AS 11.71, unless prescribed by a licensed health care provider with prescriptive authority;

require the person to be physically inside the person’s residence, or in the residence of the person’s third-party custodian, at time periods set by the court;

require the person to keep regular contact with a law enforcement officer or agency;

order the person to refrain from entering or remaining in premises licensed under AS 04;

place the person in the custody of an individual who agrees to serve as a third-party custodian of the person as provided in AS

12.30.021

;

if the person is under the treatment of a licensed health care provider, order the person to follow the provider’s treatment recommendations;

order the person to take medication that has been prescribed for the person by a licensed health care provider with prescriptive authority;

order the person to submit to electronic monitoring;

order the person to submit to a pretrial risk assessment by the Department of Corrections under AS 33.07;

order the person to submit to supervision by a pretrial services officer under AS 33.07, which may include the use of electronic monitoring;

order the person to comply with any other condition that is reasonably necessary to ensure the appearance of the person and to ensure the safety of the victim, other persons, and the community; and

require the person to comply with a program established under AS

47.38.020

if the person has been charged with an alcohol-related or substance-abuse-related offense that is an unclassified felony, a class A felony, a sexual felony, or a crime involving domestic violence.

In determining the conditions of release under this chapter, the court shall consider the following:

the nature and circumstances of the offense charged;

the weight of the evidence against the person;

the nature and extent of the person’s family ties and relationships;

the person’s employment status and history;

the length and character of the person’s past and present residence;

the person’s record of convictions and any pending criminal charges;

the person’s record of appearance at court proceedings;

assets available to the person to meet monetary conditions of release;

the person’s reputation, character, and mental condition;

the effect of the offense on the victim, any threats made to the victim, and the danger that the person poses to the victim;

any other facts that are relevant to the person’s appearance or the person’s danger to the victim, other persons, or the community; and

the pretrial risk assessment provided by a pretrial services officer, if available.

In making a finding regarding the release of a person under this chapter,

except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the burden of proof is on the prosecuting authority that a person charged with an offense should be detained or released with conditions described in (b) of this section or AS

12.30.016

;

there is a rebuttable presumption that there is a substantial risk that the person will not appear and the person poses a danger to the victim, other persons, or the community, if the person is

charged with an unclassified felony, a class A felony, a sexual felony, or a felony under AS

28.35.030

or

28.35.032

;

charged with a felony crime against a person under AS 11.41, was previously convicted of a felony crime against a person under AS 11.41 in this state or a similar offense in another jurisdiction, and less than five years have elapsed between the date of the person’s unconditional discharge on the immediately preceding offense and the commission of the present offense;

charged with a felony offense committed while the person was on release under this chapter for a charge or conviction of another offense;

charged with a crime involving domestic violence, and has been convicted in the previous five years of a crime involving domestic violence in this state or a similar offense in another jurisdiction;

arrested in connection with an accusation that the person committed a felony outside the state or is a fugitive from justice from another jurisdiction, and the court is considering release under AS 12.70.

If the supreme court establishes a schedule of bail amounts or conditions of release for misdemeanor offenses, the schedule must include a condition providing that a correctional facility shall, at the time of release, conduct a chemical test of the breath of a person who has been arrested and who is intoxicated and shall detain the person until the test result indicates that the person’s breath has less than 0.08 grams of alcohol for each 210 liters of breath or, with the consent of the person, release the person to another person who is willing and able to provide care for the person.

History.

(§ 5 ch 19 SLA 2010; am § 20 ch 83 SLA 2014; § 59 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 27 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§ 11 — 15 ch 22 SLA 2018; am § 59 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(o)(5), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts. For the effect of the 2016 amendments to this section that take effect in 2018 on Rule 41, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, see sec. 180(a), ch. 36, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 enactment of subsection (

l

), see sec. 75(b)(1), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

For statement of legislative intent regarding a release decision when a person's criminal conviction or charge outside the state is included in a pretrial risk assessment conducted under AS 33.07, see sec. 1, ch. 22, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2018 amendments to this section, see sec. 30(b), ch. 22, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the effect of the 2018 amendments to this section on Rule 41, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, see sec. 29, ch. 22, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, added (b)(18), and made a related change.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, added (

l

).

The 2018 amendment, effective June 15, 2018, in (a), substituted “Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, a judicial officer” for “A judicial officer”; in (b), deleted “risk shall be released on the person's own recognizance or upon execution of an unsecured appearance bond or unsecured performance bond; or” and made related changes; in (c), deleted “low risk shall be released on the person's own recognizance or upon execution of an unsecured appearance bond or unsecured performance bond; or” and made related and stylistic changes; in the introductory language in (g), substituted “chapter” for “section”, and in (g)(5), added “if the person is represented by an attorney” at the end; in (i)(6), added “, including convictions outside the state”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, repealed and reenacted this section.

Effective dates. —

Section 32, ch. 19, SLA 2010 makes this section effective July 1, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

Under § 31(c), ch. 19, SLA 2010, this section applies “to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (b) as amended by sec. 20, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 repeal and reenactment of this section applies "to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 12.30.016.
Release before trial in certain cases.

A judicial officer may impose, in addition to those required or authorized under AS

12.30.011

, conditions of release for offenses described in this section, if necessary to reasonably assure the person’s appearance or the safety of the victim, other persons, or the community.

In a prosecution charging a violation of AS

04.11.010

,

04.11.499

, AS

28.35.030

, or

28.35.032

, a judicial officer may order the person

to refrain from

consuming alcoholic beverages; or

possessing on the person, in the person’s residence, or in any vehicle or other property over which the person has control, alcoholic beverages;

to submit to a search without a warrant of the person, the person’s personal property, the person’s residence, or any vehicle or other property over which the person has control, for the presence of alcoholic beverages by a peace officer or pretrial services officer who has reasonable suspicion that the person is violating the conditions of the person’s release by possessing alcoholic beverages;

to submit to a breath test when requested by a law enforcement officer or pretrial services officer;

to provide a sample for a urinalysis or blood test when requested by a law enforcement officer or pretrial services officer;

to take a drug or combination of drugs intended to prevent substance abuse;

to follow any treatment plan imposed by the court under AS

28.35.028

;

to comply with a program established under AS

47.38.020

.

In a prosecution charging a violation of AS 11.71 or AS 11.73, a judicial officer may order the person

to refrain from

consuming a controlled substance; or

possessing on the person, in the person’s residence, or in any vehicle or other property over which the person has control, a controlled substance or drug paraphernalia;

to submit to a search without a warrant of the person, the person’s personal property, the person’s residence, or any vehicle or other property over which the person has control, for the presence of a controlled substance or drug paraphernalia by a peace officer or pretrial services officer who has reasonable suspicion that the person is violating the terms of the person’s release by possessing controlled substances or drug paraphernalia;

to enroll in a random drug testing program, at the person’s expense, with testing to occur not less than once a week, or to submit to random drug testing by the pretrial services office in the Department of Corrections to detect the presence of a controlled substance, with the results being submitted to the court and the prosecuting authority;

to refrain from entering or remaining in a place where a controlled substance is being used, manufactured, grown, or distributed;

to refrain from being physically present at, within a two-block area of, or within a designated area near, the location where the alleged offense occurred or at other designated places, unless the person actually resides within that area;

to refrain from the use or possession of an inhalant; or

to comply with a program established under AS

47.38.020

.

[Repealed, § 179 ch 36 SLA 2016.]

In a prosecution charging the crime of stalking that is not a crime involving domestic violence, a judicial officer may order the person to

follow the provisions of any protective order to which the person is respondent;

refrain from contacting, in any manner, including by telephone or electronic communication, the victim;

engage in counseling; if available in the community, the judicial officer shall require that counseling ordered include counseling about alternatives to aggressive behavior;

participate in a monitoring program with a global positioning device or similar technological means that meets guidelines for a monitoring program adopted by the Department of Corrections in consultation with the Department of Public Safety.

In a prosecution charging a crime under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.458

, a judicial officer

may order the person to have no contact with the victim except as specifically allowed by the court;

may order the person to reside in a place where the person is not likely to come into contact with the victim of the offense;

may order the person to have no contact with any person under 18 years of age except in the normal course of business in a public place;

shall assure that the victim and the parent or guardian of a minor victim have been notified by a law enforcement agency or the prosecuting authority of a hearing where release is being considered, or that a reasonable effort at notification has been made; and

shall solicit comments from the victim or a parent or guardian of the minor victim who is present and wishes to comment, and consider those comments before making a decision concerning the release of the person.

History.

(§ 5 ch 19 SLA 2010; am § 12 ch 43 SLA 2013; am §§ 21, 22 ch 83 SLA 2014; am §§ 60, 61, 179 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(o)(6) and (7), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (e)(4), and made a stylistic change.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, added (b)(7); added (c)(7), and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (b)(2) — (4) and (c)(2), inserted “or pretrial services officer” following “officer”; in (c)(3), inserted “with testing to occur not less than once a week, or to submit to random drug testing by the pretrial services office in the Department of Corrections” preceding “to detect” and deleted “with testing to occur not less than once a week, and”; repealed (d) effective July 12, 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 32, ch. 19, SLA 2010 makes this section effective July 1, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

Under § 31(c), ch. 19, SLA 2010, this section applies “to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to (e) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsections (b) and (c) as amended by secs. 21 and 22, ch. 83, SLA 2014, apply to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Sec. 12.30.020.
Release before trial. [Repealed, § 30 ch 19 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 12.30.021.
Third-party custodians.

In addition to other conditions imposed under AS

12.30.011

or

12.30.016

, a judicial officer may appoint a third-party custodian if the officer finds that the appointment will, singly or in combination with other conditions, reasonably ensure the person’s appearance and the safety of the victim, other persons, and the community.

A judicial officer may appoint an individual as a third-party custodian if the proposed custodian

provides information to the judicial officer about the proposed custodian’s residence, occupation, ties to the community, and relationship with the person, and provides any other information requested by the judicial officer;

is physically able to perform the duties of custodian of the person;

personally, by telephone, or by other technology approved by the court, appears in court with the person and acknowledges to the judicial officer orally and in writing that the proposed custodian

understands the duties of custodian and agrees to perform them; the proposed custodian must specifically agree to immediately report in accordance with the terms of the order if the person released has violated a condition of release; and

understands that failure to perform those duties may result in the custodian’s being held criminally liable under AS

09.50.010

or AS

11.56.758

.

A judicial officer may not appoint a person as a third-party custodian if

the proposed custodian is acting as a third-party custodian for another person;

the proposed custodian has been unconditionally discharged within the previous five years from a felony, a crime under AS 11.41, or a similar crime in this or another jurisdiction;

criminal charges are pending in this state or another jurisdiction against the proposed custodian;

the proposed custodian is on probation in this state or another jurisdiction for an offense;

the proposed custodian may be called as a witness in the prosecution of the person;

the proposed custodian resides out of state; however, a nonresident may serve as a custodian if the nonresident resides in the state while serving as custodian.

History.

(§ 6 ch 19 SLA 2010; am §§
62, 63 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§
60, 61 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(o)(8) and (9), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “, on the record,” following “officer finds”; added (1), (2) and the first phrase of (3); deleted “the appointment will, singly or in combination with other conditions,” preceding “reasonably”; substituted “ensure” for “assure” in the last phrase of the subsection; in (c)(5), inserted “there is a reasonable probability that the state will call” preceding “the proposed custodian” and deleted “may be called”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote (a), which read, “(a) In addition to other conditions imposed under AS

12.30.011

or

12.30.016

, a judicial officer may appoint a third-party custodian if the officer finds, on the record, that

“(1) pretrial supervision under AS 33.07 is not available in the person’s location;

“(2) no secured appearance or performance bonds have been ordered; and

“(3) no other conditions of release or combination of conditions can reasonably ensure the person’s appearance and the safety of the victim, other persons, and the community.”; in (c), rewrote (2), which read, “the proposed custodian has been convicted in the previous three years of a crime under AS 11.41 or a similar crime in this or another jurisdiction;” and rewrote (5), which read, there is a reasonable probability that the state will call the proposed custodian as a witness in the prosecution of the person;”.

Effective dates. —

Section 32, ch. 19, SLA 2010 makes this section effective July 1, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

Under § 31(c), ch. 19, SLA 2010, this section applies “to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Section 142(a), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of (a) and (c) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Interpretation. —

State provided legislative history indicating that the legislature intended to set minimal standards that must be met for a person to be approved as a third-party custodian but that the legislature did not intend to deprive trial courts of their discretion to reject individuals who met the minimal standards but were nevertheless unsuitable to be a third-party custodian in a particular case. This legislative history was in accord with the plain meaning of the text, which uses “may” rather than “shall” and also expressly permits a trial court to consider any other information requested by the judicial officer.
Nelson v. State, — P.3d — (Alaska Ct. App. Mar. 3, 2021).

Secs. 12.30.023,
12.30.025.
Release before trial in cases involving controlled substances or alcohol; release before trial in cases involving stalking. [Repealed, § 30 ch 19 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 12.30.027.
Release in domestic violence cases.

Before ordering release before or after trial, or pending appeal, of a person charged with or convicted of a crime involving domestic violence, the judicial officer shall consider the safety of the victim or other household member. To protect the victim, household member, other persons, and the community and to reasonably ensure the person’s appearance, the judicial officer

shall impose conditions required under AS

12.30.011

;

may impose any of the conditions authorized under AS

12.30.011

;

may impose any of the provisions of AS

18.66.100(c)(1)

— (7) and (11);

may order the person to participate in a monitoring program with a global positioning device or similar technological means that meets guidelines for a monitoring program adopted by the Department of Corrections in consultation with the Department of Public Safety; and

may impose any other condition necessary to protect the victim, household member, other persons, and the community, and to ensure the appearance of the person in court, including ordering the person to refrain from the consumption of alcohol.

A judicial officer may not order or permit a person released under (a) of this section to return to the residence or place of employment of the victim or the residence or place of employment of a petitioner who has a protective order directed to the person and issued, filed, or recognized under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

unless

20 days have elapsed following the date the person was arrested;

the victim or petitioner consents to the person’s return to the residence or place of employment;

the person does not have a prior conviction for an offense under AS 11.41 that is a crime involving domestic violence; and

the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the return to the residence or place of employment does not pose a danger to the victim or petitioner.

If the court imposes conditions of release under (a) of this section, it shall

issue a written order specifying the conditions of release;

provide a copy of the order to the person arrested or charged; and

immediately distribute a copy of the order to the law enforcement agency that arrested the person.

When a person is released from custody under (a) of this section,

from a correctional facility, the correctional facility shall notify the prosecuting authority and the prosecuting authority shall make reasonable efforts to immediately notify the alleged victim of the release, and to furnish the alleged victim with a copy of the order setting any conditions of release;

from other than a correctional facility, the arresting authority shall make reasonable efforts to immediately notify the alleged victim of the release, and to furnish the alleged victim with a copy of the order setting any conditions of release.

A person arrested for a crime involving domestic violence or for violation of a condition of release in connection with a crime involving domestic violence may not be released from custody until the person has appeared in person before a judicial officer or telephonically for arraignment.

A person may not bring a civil action for damages for a failure to comply with the provisions of this section.

[Repealed, § 30 ch 19 SLA 2010.]

History.

(§ 11 ch 64 SLA 1996; am §§ 7, 8, 30 ch 19 SLA 2010; am §§ 13, 14 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § 7 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “judicial officer” for “court”, substituted “community” for “public” in two places, added “other persons” following “household member” in two places, substituted “judicial officer shall impose conditions required under AS 12.30.11, and” for “court” following “assure the person’s appearance, the”, substituted “AS

12.30.011

” for “AS

12.30.020

” following “conditions authorized under”, deleted “bail and” following “may impose”, deleted “alleged” preceding “victim” in three places; in (b), in the introductory language, substituted “judicial officer” for “court”, added “or place of employment” twice following “the residence”, added “unless” following “AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

”, and added (b)(1) through (b)(4); and repealed (g).

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (a), substituted “ensure” for “assure” in the second sentence, inserted “may impose” at the beginning of (a)(3) and (a)(5), added (a)(4), and made stylistic changes; in (e), inserted “or for violation of a condition of release in connection with a crime involving domestic violence” following “A person arrested for a crime involving domestic violence”.

The 2017 amendment, effective September 17, 2017, in (b), near the end of the introductory language, substituted “issued, filed, or recognized” for “issued or filed”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 31(e), ch. 19, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (a) and (b) of this section “apply to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2010.”

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to (a) and (e) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.

Sec. 12.30.029.
Release in sexual abuse and sexual assault cases. [Repealed, § 30 ch 19 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 12.30.030.
Appeal from conditions of release.

If a person remains in custody after a review provided for in AS

12.30.006(c)

or (d), an appeal may be taken to the court having appellate jurisdiction over the court imposing the conditions. The appellate court shall affirm the order unless it finds that the lower court abused its discretion.

If the appellate court finds that the lower court abused its discretion, the appellate court may modify the order, remand the matter for further proceedings, or remand the matter directing entry of the appropriate order, including release under AS

12.30.011(a)

. The appeal shall be determined promptly.

History.

(Sec. 3.01 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1966; am § 12 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 12 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 65 SLA 2005; am § 9 ch 19 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, repealed and reenacted the section.

Effective dates. —

Under § 31(c), ch. 19, SLA 2010, the provisions of the 2010 repeal and reenactment of this section apply “to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 12.30.031.
Temporary release.

A person, either before trial or after conviction, who is detained under this chapter may be released temporarily if

the person is being held in connection with a misdemeanor or class B or C felony;

the release is requested because of the

death of an immediate family member of the person;

birth of the person’s child if the defendant executes an affidavit of paternity before the release;

person’s need for a mental health or substance abuse assessment that the court finds cannot be accommodated in the facility or telephonically; or

person’s need for a medical or dental examination required for acceptance into a residential treatment facility; and

the court solicits information from the Department of Corrections regarding the defendant’s conduct while incarcerated and considers that information when making a decision under this subsection.

If a court orders temporary release of a person under (a) of this section, the court shall order the person to appear in court during normal business hours at the end of the period of temporary release and before the person is returned to a correctional facility.

History.

(§ 10 ch 19 SLA 2010)

Effective dates. —

Section 32, ch. 19, SLA 2010 makes this section effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 31(c), ch. 19, SLA 2010, this section applies “to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 12.30.035.
Release pending appeal by state.

If the state appeals an order dismissing an indictment, information, or complaint, or granting a new trial after verdict or judgment, the court shall treat the defendant in accordance with the provisions governing pretrial release under this chapter.

History.

(§ 13 ch 63 SLA 1997)

Sec. 12.30.040.
Release before sentence; release after conviction.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who has been convicted of an offense and is awaiting sentence or who has filed an appeal may be released under the provisions of this chapter if the person establishes, by clear and convincing evidence, that the person can be released under conditions that will reasonably assure the appearance of the person and the safety of the victim, other persons, and the community.

A person may not be released under (a) of this section if the person has been convicted of an offense that is

an unclassified or class A felony;

a sexual felony;

a class B felony if the person has been convicted within the previous 10 years of a felony committed in this state or a similar offense committed in another jurisdiction; or

a felony in violation of AS 11.41, and the person has been found guilty but mentally ill.

A person who has been convicted of an offense and who has filed an application for post-conviction relief may not be released under this section until the court enters an order vacating all convictions against the person. A person who has prevailed in an application for post-conviction relief may seek release before trial in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(Sec. 3.02 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 39 SLA 1974; am § 36 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 42 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 50 SLA 1995; am § 5 ch 79 SLA 1995; am § 14 ch 63 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 95 SLA 2000; am § 11 ch 19 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, repealed and reenacted the section.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 31(c), ch. 19, SLA 2010, the provisions of the 2010 repeal and reenactment of this section apply “to bail proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”